Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-677
Short-time compensation program; plan;
revocation; procedure; grounds; order.

(1) The commissioner may revoke approval
of a short-time compensation plan for good cause at any time, including upon
the request of any of the affected unit's employees. The revocation order
shall be in writing and shall specify the reasons for the revocation and the
date the revocation is effective.

(2) The commissioner
may periodically review the operation of each employer's short-time compensation
plan to assure that no good cause exists for revocation of the approval of
the plan. Good cause shall include, but not be limited to, failure to comply
with the assurances given in the plan, unreasonable revision of productivity
standards for the affected unit, conduct or occurrences tending to defeat
the intent and effective operation of the short-time compensation plan, and
violation of any criteria on which approval of the plan was based.

Laws 2014, LB961, § 18.